Washington statutes.
RCW 36.08.070

Arbitration of differences.

If the board of appraisers and adjusters do not agree on any subject, value, or settlement, they shall choose a third person from an adjoining county to settle their differences, and the decision thus arrived at shall be final.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4002; 1963 c 4 s 36.08.070. Prior: 1891 c 144 s 7; RRS s 3978.]